Florida, session 2026, SB72.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 27 28 Section 1.âSubsection (5) is added to section 1003.5716, 29 Florida Statutes, to read: 30 1003.5716âTransition to postsecondary education and career 31 opportunities.âAll students with disabilities who are 3 years of 32 age to 21 years of age have the right to a free, appropriate 33 public education. As used in this section, the term âIEPâ means 34 individual education plan. 35 (5)(a)âWithin 60 calendar days after receiving parental 36 consent, a school district must complete an initial evaluation 37 to determine whether a student is eligible for an IEP. The 38 school district must convene an IEP team meeting within 30 39 calendar days after eligibility is determined. 40 (b)âIf a related service identified in a studentâs IEP is 41 not provided as scheduled, the school district must notify the 42 parent or guardian in writing within 5 school days, explain the 43 reason the service was not provided, and provide a written plan 44 for make-up services. 45 (c)âA parent or guardian has the right to access, upon 46 request, all service provider logs or progress notes within 15 47 school days after such service is provided. The school district 48 must inform parents of this right at each IEP meeting. 49 Section 2.âSection 1003.5718, Florida Statutes, is created 50 to read: 51 1003.5718âParental education, enforcement, and IEP 52 transition requirements.â 53 (1)âEach school district shall provide an individualized 54 orientation to the parent or guardian of a student newly 55 identified to be eligible for exceptional student education 56 services. The orientation must include all of the following: 57 (a)âAn overview of procedural safeguards. 58 (b)âParental rights and responsibilities. 59 (c)âInstructions on accessing and reviewing service logs. 60 (d)âInstructions on filing complaints with the Department 61 of Education. 62 (2)âThe school district must obtain a signed acknowledgment 63 from the parent or guardian confirming receipt of the 64 orientation in a format the parent understands. Annual refresher 65 orientations must be offered and documented. All acknowledgment 66 forms must be retained in the studentâs education records. 67 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.